Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1534
Director; additional powers.

The powers vested in the director by the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act shall be additional to any other powers to enforce any penalties, fines, or forfeitures authorized by law with respect to the acts and practices defined and determined by such act to be unfair.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 16.